California statutes. Family Code
 possible, the court shall schedule the hearing prior to that date. If the court cannot hear the matter prior to the date of deployment out of state, and the servicemember complies with the conditions set forth in the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, Section 522 of the Appendix of Title 50 of the United States Code, the court shall grant a stay of proceedings consistent with the timelines for stays set forth in that section. If, after granting the mandatory stay required by Section 522 of the Appendix of Title 50 of the United States Code, the court fails to grant the discretionary stay described under the law, it shall comply with the federal mandate to appoint counsel to represent the interests of the deployed servicemember. The court may not proceed with the matter if it does not appoint counsel, unless the servicemember is represented by other counsel. If the court stays the
 proceeding until after the return of the service member, the servicemember shall request the court to set the matter for hearing within 90 days of return from deployment or the matter shall be taken off calendar and the existing order may not be made retroactive pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 3653.

(3) A servicemember who does not file a notice of activation of military service and request to modify a support order or order to show cause or notice of motion prior to
 deployment out of state nonetheless shall not be subject to penalties otherwise authorized by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4720) of Part 5 on the amount of child support that would not have accrued if the order had been modified pursuant to paragraph (2), absent a finding by the court of good cause. Any such finding shall be stated on the record.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, interest shall not accrue on that amount of a child support obligation that would not have become due and owing if the activated servicemember modified the support order upon activation to reflect the change in income due to the activation. Upon a finding by the court that good cause did not exist for the servicemember’s failure to seek, or delay in seeking, the modification, interest shall accrue as otherwise allowed by law.

(d) An order for spousal support may not be modified or terminated to the extent that a written agreement or, if there is no written agreement, an oral agreement entered into in open court between the parties, specifically provides that the spousal support is not subject to modification or termination.

(e) This section applies whether or not the support order is based upon an agreement between the parties.

(f) This section is effective only with respect to a property settlement agreement entered into on or after January 1, 1970, and does not affect an agreement entered into before January 1, 1970, as to which Chapter 1308 of the Statutes of 1967 shall apply.

(g) (1) The Judicial Council, no later than 90 days after the effective date of the act adding this section, shall develop forms and procedures necessary to implement paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). The Judicial Council shall ensure that all forms adopted pursuant to this section are in plain language.

(2) The form developed by the Judicial Council, in addition to other items the Judicial Council determines to be necessary or appropriate, shall include the following:

(A) The date of deployment and all information relevant to the determination of the amount of child support, including whether the servicemember’s employer will supplement the servicemember’s income during the deployment.

(B) A notice informing the opposing party that, absent a finding of good cause, the order will be made retroactive to the date of service of the form or the date of deployment, whichever is later.

(C) Notice that the requesting party must notify the court and the other party upon return from military duty and seek to bring any unresolved request for modification to hearing within 90 days of return, or else lose the right to modify the order pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 39.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3652.

Except as against a governmental agency, an order modifying, terminating, or setting aside a support order may include an award of attorney’s fees and court costs to the prevailing party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 653, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

3653.

(a) An order modifying or terminating a support order may be made retroactive to the date of the filing of the notice of motion or order to show cause to modify or terminate, or to any subsequent date, except as provided in subdivision (b) or by federal law (42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(9)).

(b) If an order modifying or terminating a support order is entered due to the unemployment of either the support obligor or the support obligee, the order shall be made retroactive to the later of the date of the service on the opposing party of the notice of motion or order to show cause to modify or terminate or the date of unemployment, subject to the notice requirements of federal law (42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(9)), unless the court finds good cause not to make the order retroactive and states its reasons on the record.

(c) If an order modifying or terminating a support order is entered due to a change in income resulting from the activation to United States military service or National Guard duty and deployment out of state for either the support obligor or the support obligee, the order shall be made retroactive to the later of the date of the service on the opposing party of the notice of activation, notice of motion, order to show cause to modify or terminate, or the date of activation, subject to the notice requirements of federal law (42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(9)), unless the court finds good cause not to make the order retroactive and states its reasons on the record. Good cause shall include, but not be limited to, a finding by the court that the delay in seeking the modification was not reasonable under the circumstances faced by the service member.

(d) If an order decreasing or terminating a support order is entered retroactively pursuant to this section, the support obligor
 may be entitled to, and the support obligee may be ordered to repay, according to the terms specified in the order, any amounts previously paid by the support obligor pursuant to the prior order that are in excess of the amounts due pursuant to the retroactive order. The court may order that the repayment by the support obligee shall be made over any period of time and in any manner, including, but not limited to, by an offset against future support payments or wage assignment, as the court deems just and reasonable. In determining whether to order a repayment, and in establishing the terms of repayment, the court shall consider all of the following factors:

(1) The amount to be repaid.

(2) The duration of the support order prior to modification or termination.

(3) The financial impact on the support obligee of any particular method of repayment such as an offset against future support payments or wage assignment.

(4) Any other facts or circumstances that the court deems relevant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 154, Sec. 3.   Effective August 30, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3654.

At the request of either party, an order modifying, terminating, or setting aside a support order shall include a statement of decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 653, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Discovery Before Commencing Modification or Termination Proceeding [3660. - 3668.]

3660.

The purpose of this article is to permit inexpensive discovery of facts before the commencement of a proceeding for modification or termination of an order for child, family, or spousal support.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3662.

Methods of discovery other than that described in this article may only be used if a motion for modification or termination of the support order is pending.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3663.

In the absence of a pending motion for modification or termination of a support order, a request for discovery pursuant to this article may be undertaken not more frequently than once every 12 months.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3664.

(a) At any time following a judgment of dissolution of marriage or legal separation of the parties, or a determination of parentage, that provides for payment of support, either the party ordered to pay support or the party to whom support was ordered to be paid or that party’s assignee, without leave of court, may serve a request on the other party for the production of a completed current income and expense declaration in the form adopted by the Judicial Council.

(b) If there is no response within 35 days of service of the request or if the responsive income and expense declaration is incomplete as to any wage information, including the attachment of
 pay stubs and income tax returns, the requesting party may serve a request on the employer of the other party for information limited to the income and benefits provided to the party in the form adopted by the Judicial Council. The employer may require the requesting party to pay the reasonable costs of copying this information for the requesting party. The date specified in the request served on the employer for the production of income and benefit information shall not be less than 15 days from the date this request is issued.

(c) The requesting party shall serve or cause to be served on the employee described in this section, or on the employee’s attorney, a copy of the request served on the employer prior to the date specified in the request served on the employer for the production of income and benefit information. This copy shall be
 accompanied by a notice, in a typeface that is intended to call attention to its terms, that indicates all of the following:

(1) That information limited to the income and benefits provided to the employee by the employer is being sought from the employer named in the request for production.

(2) That the information may be protected by right of privacy.

(3) That, if the employee objects to the production of this information by the employer to the requesting party, the employee shall notify the court, in writing, of this objection prior to the date specified in the request served on the employer for the production of income and benefit information.

(4) That, if
 the requesting party does not agree, in writing, to cancel or narrow the scope of the request for the production of this information by the employer, the employee should consult an attorney regarding the employee’s right to privacy and how to protect this right.

(d) The employee described in this section may, prior to the date specified in the request served on the employer for the production of income and benefit information, bring a motion pursuant to Section 1987.1 of the Code of Civil Procedure to quash or modify this request in the same manner as a subpoena duces tecum. Notice of this motion shall be given to the employer prior to the date specified in the request served on the employer for the production of income and benefit information. An employer is not required to produce information limited to the income and benefits of
 the employee, except upon order of the court or upon agreement of the parties, employers, and employee affected.

(e) Service of a request for production of an income and expense declaration or for income and benefit information pursuant to this section or a copy thereof shall be by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the party to be served, or by personal service.

(f) The form adopted by the Judicial Council for purposes of the request on an employer described in subdivision (b) shall state that compliance with the request is voluntary, except upon order of the court or upon agreement of the parties, employers, and employee affected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 40.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3665.

(a) A copy of the prior year’s federal and state personal income tax returns shall be attached to the income and expense declaration of each party.

(b) A party shall not disclose the contents or provide copies of the other party’s tax returns to anyone except the court, the party’s attorney, the party’s accountant, or other financial consultant assisting with matters relating to the proceeding, or any other person permitted by the court.

(c) The tax returns shall be controlled by the court as provided in Section 3552.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3666.

This article may be enforced in the manner specified in Sections 1991, 1991.1, 1991.2, 1992, and 1993 of the Code of Civil Procedure and in the Civil Discovery Act (Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure), and any other statutes applicable to the enforcement of procedures for discovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

3667.

Upon the subsequent filing of a motion for modification or termination of the support order by the requesting party, if the court finds that the income and expense declaration submitted by the responding party pursuant to this article was incomplete, inaccurate, or missing the prior year’s federal and state personal income tax returns, or that the declaration was not submitted in good faith, the court may order sanctions against the responding party in the form of payment of all costs of the motion, including the filing fee and the costs of the depositions and subpoenas necessary to be utilized in order to obtain complete and accurate information. This section is applicable regardless of whether a party has utilized subdivision (b) of Section 3664.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 506, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

3668.

The Judicial Council shall adopt forms which shall be used in the procedure provided by this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Simplified Procedure for Modification of Support Order [3680. - 3680.5.]

3680.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) There is currently no simple method available to parents to quickly modify their support orders when circumstances warrant a change in the amount of support.

(2) The lack of a simple method for parents to use to modify support orders has led to orders in which the amount of support ordered is inappropriate based on the parents’ financial circumstances.

(3) Parents should not have to incur significant costs or experience significant delays in obtaining an appropriate support order.

(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that the Judicial Council adopt rules of court and forms for a simplified method to modify support orders. This simplified method should be designed to be used by parents who are not represented by counsel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 957, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

3680.5.

(a) The local child support agency shall monitor child support cases and seek modifications, when needed.

(b) At least once every three years, the local child support agency shall review, and, if appropriate, seek modification of, each child support case for which assistance is being provided under the CalWORKs program, pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 488, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Relief From Orders [3690. - 3693.]

3690.

(a) The court may, on any terms that may be just, relieve a party from a support order, or any part or parts thereof, after the six-month time limit of Section 473 of the Code of Civil Procedure has run, based on the grounds, and within the time limits, provided in this article.

(b) In all proceedings under this division, before granting relief, the court shall find that the facts alleged as the grounds for relief materially affected the original order and that the moving party would materially benefit from the granting of the relief.

(c) Nothing in this article shall limit or modify the provisions of Section 17432 or 17433.

(d) This section shall only be operative if Assembly Bill 196, of the 1999–2000 Regular Session, is enacted and becomes operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 653, Sec. 6 (2nd text).   Effective January 1, 2000.   Note: Operational condition in subd. (d) was satisfied; AB 196 was enacted as Stats. 1999, Ch. 478.)
-------------------------------------------

3691.

The grounds and time limits for an action or motion to set aside a support order, or part thereof, are governed by this section and shall be one of the following:

(a) Actual fraud. Where the defrauded party was kept in ignorance or in some other manner, other than through the party’s own lack of care or attention, was fraudulently prevented from fully participating in the proceeding. An action or motion based on fraud shall be brought within six months after the date on which the complaining party discovered or reasonably should have discovered the fraud.

(b) Perjury. An action or motion based on perjury shall be brought
 within six months after the date on which the complaining party discovered or reasonably should have discovered the perjury.

(c) Lack of Notice.

(1) When service of a summons has not resulted in notice to a party in time to defend the action for support and a default or default judgment has been entered against the party in the action, the party may serve and file a notice of motion to set aside the default and for leave to defend the action. The notice of motion shall be served and filed within a reasonable time, but in no event later than six months after the party obtains or reasonably should have obtained notice (A) of the support order, or (B) that the party’s income and assets are subject to attachment pursuant to the order.

(2) A notice of motion to set aside a support order pursuant to this subdivision shall be accompanied by an affidavit showing, under oath, that the party’s lack of notice in time to defend the action was not caused by avoidance of service or inexcusable neglect. The party shall serve and file with the notice a copy of the answer, motion, or other pleading proposed to be filed in the action.

(3) The court may not set aside or otherwise relieve a party from a support order pursuant to this subdivision if service of the summons was accomplished in accordance with existing requirements of law regarding service of process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 41.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3692.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, or any other law, a support order may not be set aside simply because the court finds that it was inequitable when made, nor simply because subsequent circumstances caused the support ordered to become excessive or inadequate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 653, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

3693.

When ruling on an action or motion to set aside a support order, the court shall set aside only those provisions materially affected by the circumstances leading to the court’s decision to grant relief. However, the court has discretion to set aside the entire order, if necessary, for equitable considerations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 653, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Health Insurance [3750. - 3773.]



  ARTICLE 1. Health Insurance Coverage for Supported Child [3750. - 3753.]

3750.

“Health insurance coverage” as used in this article includes all of the following:

(a) Vision care and dental care coverage whether the vision care or dental care coverage is part of existing health insurance coverage or is issued as a separate policy or plan.

(b) Provision for the delivery of health care services by a fee for service, health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, or any other type of health care delivery system under which medical services could be provided to a dependent child of an absent parent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1062, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

3751.

(a) (1) Support orders issued or modified pursuant to this chapter shall include a provision requiring the child support obligor to keep the agency designated under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq.) informed of whether the obligor has health insurance coverage at a reasonable cost and, if so, the health insurance policy information.

(2) When an amount is set for current support, the court shall require that health insurance coverage for a supported child shall be maintained by either or both parents if that insurance is available at no cost or at a reasonable cost to the parent. Health insurance coverage shall be rebuttably presumed to
 be reasonable in cost if the cost to the responsible parent providing medical support does not exceed 5 percent of the parent’s gross income. In applying the 5 percent for the cost of health insurance, the cost is the difference between self-only and family coverage. If the obligor is entitled to a low-income adjustment as provided in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 4055, medical support shall be deemed not reasonable, unless the court determines that not requiring medical support would be unjust and inappropriate in the particular case. If the court determines that the cost of health insurance coverage is not reasonable, the court shall state its reasons on the record. If the court determines that, although the obligor is entitled to a low-income adjustment, not requiring medical support would be unjust and inappropriate, the court shall state its reasons on the record.

(b) If the court determines that health insurance coverage is not available at no cost or at a reasonable cost, the court’s order for support shall contain a provision that specifies that health insurance coverage shall be obtained if it becomes available at no cost or at a reasonable cost. Upon health insurance coverage at no cost or at a reasonable cost becoming available to a parent, the parent shall apply for that coverage.

(c) The court’s order for support shall require the parent who, at the time of the order or subsequently, provides health insurance coverage for a supported child to seek continuation of coverage for the child upon attainment of the limiting age for a dependent child under the health insurance coverage if the child meets the criteria specified under Section
 1373 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 10277 or 10278 of the Insurance Code and that health insurance coverage is available at no cost or at a reasonable cost to the parent or parents, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 42.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3751.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an employer or insurer shall not deny enrollment of a child under the health insurance coverage of a child’s parent on any of the following grounds:

(1) The child was born out of wedlock.

(2) The child is not claimed as a dependent on the parent’s federal income tax return.

(3) The child does not reside with the parent or within the insurer’s service area.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any case in which a parent is required by a court or administrative order to provide health insurance coverage for a child and the parent is eligible for family health coverage through an employer or an insurer, the employer or insurer shall do all of the following, as applicable:

(1) Permit the parent to enroll under health insurance coverage any child who is otherwise
 eligible to enroll for that coverage, without regard to any enrollment period restrictions.

(2) If the parent is enrolled in health insurance coverage but fails to apply to obtain coverage of the child, enroll that child under the health coverage upon presentation of the court order or request by the local child support agency, the other parent or person having custody of the child, or the Medi-Cal program.

(3) The employer or insurer shall not disenroll or eliminate coverage of a child unless either of the following applies:

(A) The employer has eliminated family health insurance coverage for all of the employer’s employees.

(B) The employer or insurer is provided with satisfactory written evidence that either of the following apply:

(i) The court order or administrative order is no longer in effect or is terminated pursuant to Section 3770.

(ii) The child is or will be enrolled in comparable health insurance coverage through another insurer that will take effect not later than the effective date of the child’s disenrollment.

(c) In any case in which health insurance coverage is provided for a child pursuant to a court or administrative order, the insurer shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide any information, including, but not limited to, the health insurance membership or identification card regarding the child, the evidence of coverage and disclosure form, and any other information provided to the covered parent about the child’s health care coverage to the noncovered parent having custody of the child or any other person having custody of the child and to the local child support agency when requested by the local child support agency.

(2) Permit the noncovered parent or person having custody of the child, or a provider with the approval of
 the noncovered parent or person having custody, to submit claims for covered services without the approval of the covered parent.

(3) Make payment on claims submitted in accordance with subparagraph (2) directly to the noncovered parent or person having custody, the provider, or to the Medi-Cal program. Payment on claims for services provided to the child shall be made to the covered parent for claims submitted or paid by the covered parent.

(d) For purposes of this section, “insurer” includes every health care service plan, self-insured welfare benefit plan, including those regulated pursuant to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001, et seq.), self-funded employer plan, disability insurer, nonprofit hospital service plan, labor union trust fund, employer, and any other similar plan, insurer, or entity offering a health coverage plan.

(e) For purposes of this section, “person having
 custody of the child” is defined as a legal guardian, a caregiver who is authorized to enroll the child in school or to authorize medical care for the child pursuant to Section 6550, or a person with whom the child resides.

(f) For purposes of this section, “employer” has the meaning provided in Section 5210.

(g) For purposes of this section, the insurer shall notify the covered parent and noncovered parent having custody of the child or any other person having custody of the child in writing at any time that health insurance for the child is terminated.

(h) The requirements of subdivision (g) shall not apply unless the court, employer, or person having custody of the child provides the insurer with one of the following:

(1) A qualified medical child support order that meets the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 1169 of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(2) A health insurance coverage assignment or assignment order made pursuant to Section 3761.

(3) A national medical support notice made pursuant to Section 3773.

(i) The noncovered parent or person having custody of the child may contact the insurer, by telephone or in writing, and request information about the health insurance coverage for the child. Upon request of the noncovered parent or person having custody of the child, the insurer shall provide the requested information that is specific to the health insurance coverage for the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 755, Sec. 2.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3752.

(a) If the local child support agency has been designated as the assigned payee for child support, the court shall order the parent to notify the local child support agency upon applying for and obtaining health insurance coverage for the child within a reasonable period of time.

(b) The local child support agency shall obtain a completed medical form from the parent in accordance with Section 17422 and shall forward the completed form to the State Department of Health Services.

(c) In those cases where the local child support agency is providing medical support enforcement services, the local child support agency shall provide the parent or person having custody of the child with information pertaining to the health insurance policy that has been secured for the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 30.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

3752.5.

(a) A child support order issued or modified pursuant to this division shall include a provision requiring the child support obligor to keep the obligee informed of whether the obligor has health insurance made available through the obligor’s employer or has other group health insurance and, if so, the health insurance policy information. The support obligee under a child support order shall inform the support obligor of whether the obligee has health insurance made available through the employer or other group health insurance and, if so, the health insurance policy information.

(b) A child support order issued or modified pursuant to this division shall include a provision requiring the child support obligor and obligee to provide the information described in subdivision (a) for a child or an adult who meets the criteria for continuation of health insurance coverage upon attaining the limiting age pursuant to Section 1373 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 10277 or 10278 of the Insurance Code.

(c) The Judicial Council shall modify the form of the order for health insurance coverage (family law) to notify child support obligors of the requirements of this section and of Section 3752. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Judicial Council shall not be required to modify the form of the order for health insurance coverage (family law) to include the provisions described in subdivision (b) until January 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 617, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3753.

The cost of the health insurance shall be in addition to the child support amount ordered under Article 2 (commencing with Section 4050), with allowance for the costs of health insurance actually obtained given due consideration under subdivision (d) of Section 4059.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Health Insurance Coverage Assignment [3760. - 3773.]

3760.

As used in this article, unless the provision or context otherwise requires:

(a) “Employer” includes the United States government and any public entity as defined in Section 811.2 of the Government Code.

(b) “Health insurance,” “health insurance plan,” “health insurance coverage,” “health care services,” or “health insurance coverage assignment” includes vision care and dental care coverage whether the vision care or dental care coverage is part of existing health insurance coverage or is issued as a separate policy or plan.

(c) “Health insurance coverage assignment” or “assignment order” means an order made under Section 3761.

(d) “National medical support notice” means the notice required by Section 666(a)(19) of Title 42 of the United States Code with respect to an order made pursuant to Section 3773.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 119, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3761.

(a) Upon application by a party or local child support agency in any proceeding where the court has ordered either or both parents to maintain health insurance coverage under Article 1 (commencing with Section 3750), the court shall order the employer of the obligor parent or other person providing health insurance to the obligor to enroll the supported child in the health insurance plan available to the obligor through the employer or other person and to deduct the appropriate premium or costs, if any, from the earnings of the obligor unless the court makes a finding of good cause for not making the order.

(b) (1) The application shall state that the party or local child support agency seeking the assignment order has given the obligor a written notice of the intent to seek a health insurance coverage assignment order in the event of a default in instituting coverage required by court order on behalf of the
 parties’ child and that the notice was transmitted by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or personally served at least 15 days before the date of the filing of the application for the order. The written notice of the intent to seek an assignment order required by this subdivision may be given at the time of filing a petition or complaint for support or at any later time, but shall be given at least 15 days before the date of filing the application under this section. The obligor may at any time waive the written notice required by this subdivision.

(2) The party or local child support agency seeking the assignment order shall file a certificate of service showing the method and date of service of the order and the statements required under Section 3772 upon the employer or provider of health insurance.

(c) The total amount that may be withheld from earnings for all obligations, including health insurance assignments, is limited by subdivision (a) of
 Section 706.052 of the Code of Civil Procedure or Section 1673 of Title 15 of the United States Code, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 31.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

3762.

Good cause for not making a health insurance coverage assignment order shall be limited to either of the following:

(a) The court finds that one of the conditions listed in subdivision (a) of Section 3765 or in Section 3770 exists.

(b) The court finds that the health insurance coverage assignment order would cause extraordinary hardship to the obligor. The court shall specify the nature of the extraordinary hardship and, whenever possible, a date by which the obligor shall obtain health insurance coverage or be subject to a health insurance coverage assignment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3763.

(a) The health insurance coverage assignment order may be ordered at the time of trial or entry of a judgment ordering health insurance coverage. The order operates as an assignment and is binding on any existing or future employer of the obligor parent, or other person providing health insurance to the obligor, upon whom a copy of the order has been served.

(b) The order of assignment may be modified at any time by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3764.

(a) A health insurance coverage assignment order does not become effective until 20 days after service by the applicant of the assignment order on the employer.

(b) Within 10 days after service of the order, the employer or other person providing health insurance to the obligor shall deliver a copy of the order to the obligor, together with a written statement of the obligor’s rights and the relevant procedures under the law to move to quash the order.

(c) Service of a health insurance coverage assignment order on any employer or other person providing health insurance may be made by first class mail in the manner prescribed in Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3765.

(a) The obligor may move to quash a health insurance coverage assignment order as provided in this section if the obligor declares under penalty of perjury that there is error on any of the following grounds:

(1) No order to maintain health insurance has been issued under Article 1 (commencing with Section 3750).

(2) The amount to be withheld for premiums is greater than that permissible under Article 1 (commencing with Section 3750) or greater than the amount otherwise ordered by the court.

(3) The amount of the increased premium is unreasonable.

(4) The alleged obligor is not the obligor from whom health insurance coverage is due.

(5) The child is or will be otherwise provided health care coverage.

(6) The employer’s choice of coverage is inappropriate.

(b) The
 motion and notice of motion to quash the assignment order, including the declaration required by subdivision (a), shall be filed with the court issuing the assignment order within 15 days after delivery of a copy of the order to the obligor pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3764. The court clerk shall set the motion for hearing not less than 15 days, nor more than 30 days, after receipt of the notice of motion. The clerk shall, within five days after receipt of the notice of motion, deliver a copy of the notice of motion to (1) the district attorney personally or by first-class mail, and (2) the applicant and the employer or other person providing health insurance, at the appropriate addresses contained in the application, by first-class mail.

(c) Upon a finding of error described in subdivision (a), the court shall quash the assignment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3766.

(a) The employer, or other person providing health insurance, shall take steps to commence coverage, consistent with the order for the health insurance coverage assignment, within 30 days after service of the assignment order upon the obligor under Section 3764 unless the employer or other person providing health insurance coverage receives an order issued pursuant to Section 3765 to quash the health insurance coverage assignment. The employer, or the person providing health insurance, shall commence coverage at the earliest possible time and, if applicable, consistent with the group plan enrollment rules.
